Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 12. JUVENILE JUSTICE SERVICES AND FACILITIES

SUBTITLE A. TEXAS JUVENILE JUSTICE BOARD AND TEXAS JUVENILE JUSTICE DEPARTMENT

CHAPTER 201. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 201.001. DEFINITIONS. (a) In this title:

(1) "Board" means the Texas Juvenile Justice Board.

(2) "Child" means an individual:

(A) 10 years of age or older and younger than 18 years of age who is under the jurisdiction of a juvenile court; or

(B) 10 years of age or older and younger than 19 years of age who is committed to the department under Title 3, Family Code.

(3) "Court" means a juvenile court.

(4) "Department" means the Texas Juvenile Justice Department.

(5) "Executive director" means the executive director of the department.

(6) "Juvenile board" means a body established by law to provide juvenile probation services to a county.

(7) "State aid" means funds allocated by the department to a juvenile board to financially assist the juvenile board in achieving the purposes of this title and in conforming to the department's standards and policies.

(a-1) Expired.

(a-2) Expired.

(b) Effective December 1, 2011, a reference in other law to:

(1) the Texas Juvenile Probation Commission means the department; or

(2) the Texas Youth Commission means the department.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.002, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 201.002. PURPOSES AND INTERPRETATION. This title shall be construed to have the following public purposes:

(1) creating a unified state juvenile justice agency that works in partnership with local county governments, the courts, and communities to promote public safety by providing a full continuum of effective supports and services to youth from initial contact through termination of supervision; and

(2) creating a juvenile justice system that produces positive outcomes for youth, families, and communities by:

(A) assuring accountability, quality, consistency, and transparency through effective monitoring and the use of systemwide performance measures;

(B) promoting the use of program and service designs and interventions proven to be most effective in rehabilitating youth;

(C) prioritizing the use of community-based or family-based programs and services for youth over the placement or commitment of youth to a secure facility;

(D) operating the state facilities to effectively house and rehabilitate the youthful offenders that cannot be safely served in another setting; and

(E) protecting and enhancing the cooperative agreements between state and local county governments.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.002, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 201.003. GOALS. The goals of the department and all programs, facilities, and services that are operated, regulated, or funded by the department are to:

(1) support the development of a consistent county-based continuum of effective interventions, supports, and services for youth and families that reduce the need for out-of-home placement;

(2) increase reliance on alternatives to placement and commitment to secure state facilities, consistent with adequately addressing a youthful offender's treatment needs and protection of the public;

(3) locate the facilities as geographically close as possible to necessary workforce and other services while supporting the youths' connection to their families;

(4) encourage regional cooperation that enhances county collaboration;

(5) enhance the continuity of care throughout the juvenile justice system; and

(6) use secure facilities of a size that supports effective youth rehabilitation and public safety.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.002, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 201.004. INTERAGENCY AND INTERGOVERNMENTAL COOPERATION. (a) To improve services to youth, the department may cooperate and contract with:

(1) the federal government;

(2) governmental agencies in this state and other states;

(3) political subdivisions of the state; and

(4) private agencies and foundations.

(b) The executive director, the commissioner of education, the commissioner of family and protective services, the commissioner of state health services, the executive commissioner of health and human services, and the chair of the workforce commission, or their designees, shall meet at least annually to:

(1) discuss mutual issues relating to at-risk youth and youthful offenders, and community support systems for families and youth;

(2) resolve conflicts in providing services to youth; and

(3) make recommendations to the governor and legislature.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 1.002, eff. September 1, 2011.